tr: Helikopter görev türü: Tarım (ilaçlama); Kurumsal/VIP; Acil sağlık hizmetleri (EMS/Medevac); Dış taşıma (askı yükü); Yangın söndürme; Kolluk kuvvetleri; Askeri; Açık deniz/petrol ve gaz desteği; Yolcu taşımacılığı; Arama ve kurtarma (SAR); Turizm/Gezi; Eğitim; Genel amaçlı; Diğer
ko: 헬리콥터 임무 유형: 농업용(농약 살포); 기업용/VIP; 응급 의료 서비스(EMS/의무후송); 외부 리프트(슬링 로드); 소방용; 법 집행용; 군용; 해상/오일 및 가스 지원; 여객 수송용; 수색 및 구조(SAR); 관광/유람용; 훈련용; 다목적; 기타
nb: Helikopteroppdragstype: Landbruk (avlingssprøyting); Bedrift / VIP; Akuttmedisinske tjenester (EMS/Medevac); Eksternt løft (underhengende last); Brannslukking; Politi; Militær; Offshore / olje- og gass-støtte; Passasjertransport; Søk og redning (SAR); Turisme / sightseeing; Opplæring; Flerbruk; Annet
pl: Typ misji śmigłowca: Rolniczy (oprysk upraw); Korporacyjny/VIP; Ratownictwo medyczne (EMS/Medevac); Transport podwieszony; Gaśniczy; Służby porządkowe; Wojskowy; Offshore/obsługa sektora naftowego i gazowego; Transport pasażerski; Poszukiwania i ratownictwo (SAR); Turystyka/zwiedzanie; Szkoleniowy; Użytkowy; Inny
fi: Helikopterin tehtävätyyppi: Maatalous (kasvinsuojeluruiskutus); Yritys/VIP; Ensihoitopalvelut (EMS/Medevac); Ulkoinen nosto (riippukuorma); Palonsammutus; Lainvalvonta; Sotilaallinen; Offshore/öljy- ja kaasutuki; Matkustajakuljetus; Etsintä ja pelastus (SAR); Matkailu/kiertoajelut; Koulutus; Hyötykäyttö; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de missão do helicóptero: Agrícola (pulverização de culturas); Corporativo/VIP; Serviços médicos de emergência (EMS/Medevac); Elevação externa (carga suspensa); Combate a incêndios; Policial; Militar; Suporte offshore/óleo e gás; Transporte de passageiros; Busca e resgate (SAR); Turismo/Passeio panorâmico; Treinamento; Utilitário; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta misije helikopterom: Poljoprivreda (prskanje usjeva); Korporativno / VIP; Hitne medicinske službe (EMS/Medevac); Vanjsko podizanje (nošenje tereta); Gašenje požara; Provedba zakona; Vojna namjena; Podrška na moru / industrija nafte i plina; Prijevoz putnika; Potraga i spašavanje (SAR); Turizam / razgledavanje; Obuka; Komunalno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta misije s helikopterjem: Kmetijsko (škropljenje pridelkov); Korporativno/VIP; Nujna medicinska pomoč (NMP/Medevac); Zunanje dvigovanje (tovor na zanki); Gasilsko; Kazenski pregon; Vojaško; Podpora na morju/črpanje nafte in plina; Potniški prevoz; Iskanje in reševanje (SAR); Turizem/ogledi; Usposabljanje; Večnamensko; Drugo
zh-TW: 直升機任務類型: 農業 (農藥噴灑); 企業/VIP; 緊急醫療服務 (EMS/醫療後送); 外部吊掛 (吊索負載); 消防; 執法; 軍事; 離岸/油氣支援; 客運; 搜救 (SAR); 旅遊/觀光; 訓練; 通用; 其他
it: Tipo di missione dell'elicottero: Agricolo (irrorazione delle colture); Corporate/VIP; Servizi medici di emergenza (EMS/Medevac); Sollevamento esterno (carico sospeso); Antincendio; Forze dell'ordine; Militare; Supporto offshore/petrolio e gas; Trasporto passeggeri; Ricerca e soccorso (SAR); Turismo/visite turistiche; Addestramento; Utilità; Altro
hu: Helikopteres küldetés típusa: Mezőgazdasági (permetező); Vállalati/VIP; Sürgősségi orvosi (EMS/Medevac); Külső emelés (függesztett teher); Tűzoltó; Rendészeti; Katonai; Tengeri / olaj- és gázipari támogatás; Személyszállítás; Kutató-mentő (SAR); Turizmus/városnézés; Kiképző; Többcélú (Utility); Egyéb
es: Tipo de misión del helicóptero: Agrícola (fumigación de cultivos); Corporativo/VIP; Servicios médicos de emergencia (EMS/Evacuación médica); Elevación externa (carga eslingada); Lucha contra incendios; Fuerzas del orden; Militar; Apoyo marítimo/gas y petróleo; Transporte de pasajeros; Búsqueda y rescate (SAR); Turismo/vistas panorámicas; Entrenamiento; Utilitario; Otro
da: Type af helikoptermission: Landbrug (afgrødesprøjtning); Erhverv/VIP; Akutmedicinsk tjeneste (EMS/Medevac); Eksternt løft (hængende last); Brandslukning; Politi/retshåndhævelse; Militær; Offshore/olie- og gassupport; Passagertransport; Eftersøgning og redning (SAR); Turisme/sightseeing; Træning; Brugsformål; Andet
el: Τύπος αποστολής ελικοπτέρου: Γεωργική (αεροψεκασμός); Εταιρική/VIP; Υπηρεσίες επείγουσας ιατρικής (EMS/Medevac); Εξωτερική ανύψωση (αιωρούμενο φορτίο); Πυρόσβεση; Επιβολή του νόμου; Στρατιωτική; Υπεράκτια/Υποστήριξη πετρελαίου & φυσικού αερίου; Μεταφορά επιβατών; Έρευνα & διάσωση (SAR); Τουρισμός/Περιήγηση; Εκπαίδευση; Βοηθητική; Άλλη
de: Einsatzart des Hubschraubers: Landwirtschaft (Agrarflug); Geschäftlich/VIP; Rettungsdienst (EMS/Medevac); Außenlast (Sling-Load); Brandbekämpfung; Strafverfolgung; Militär; Offshore/Öl- und Gasversorgung; Personentransport; Such- und Rettungsdienst (SAR); Tourismus/Rundflüge; Ausbildung; Mehrzweck; Sonstige
cs: Typ mise vrtulníku: Zemědělský (postřik plodin); Korporátní/VIP; Zdravotnická záchranná služba (EMS/Medevac); Externí zvedání (zavěšené břemeno); Hasičský; Policie; Vojenský; Pobřežní oblasti / podpora těžby ropy a zemního plynu; Přeprava cestujících; Pátrání a záchrana (SAR); Turistika/vyhlídkové lety; Výcvikový; Víceúčelový; Jiný
sv: Helikopteruppdragstyp: Jordbruk (besprutning); Företag/VIP; Ambulanssjukvård (EMS/Medevac); Externt lyft (hängande last); Brandbekämpning; Polis/brottsbekämpning; Militär; Offshore/olja och gas; Passagerartransport; Sök och räddning (SAR); Turism/sightseeing; Utbildning; Nytto; Övrigt
lt-LT: Sraigtasparnio misijos tipas: Žemės ūkio (pasėlių purškimas); Verslo / VIP; Greitosios medicinos pagalbos (EMS / Medevac); Išorinio krovinio kėlimas; Gaisrų gesinimas; Teisėsauga; Karinis; Jūrinis / naftos ir dujų pramonės aptarnavimas; Keleivių transportavimas; Paieška ir gelbėjimas (SAR); Turizmas / ekskursijos; Mokomasis; Universalus (Utility); Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de missão do helicóptero: Agrícola (pulverização de culturas); Corporativo/VIP; Serviços médicos de urgência (EMS/Medevac); Elevação externa (carga suspensa); Combate a incêndios; Forças de segurança; Militar; Apoio offshore/petróleo e gás; Transporte de passageiros; Busca e salvamento (SAR); Turismo/passeios turísticos; Treino; Utilitário; Outro
th: ประเภทภารกิจเฮลิคอปเตอร์: การเกษตร (ฉีดพ่นพืชผล); องค์กร/VIP; บริการการแพทย์ฉุกเฉิน (EMS/Medevac); ยกของภายนอก (สายสลิง); ดับเพลิง; บังคับใช้กฎหมาย; การทหาร; นอกชายฝั่ง/สนับสนุนด้านน้ำมันและก๊าซ; ขนส่งผู้โดยสาร; ค้นหาและกู้ภัย (SAR); ท่องเที่ยว/ชมวิว; ฝึกอบรม; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ misie vrtuľníka: Poľnohospodárstvo (postrek plodín); Korporátne/VIP; Záchranná zdravotná služba (ZZS/Medevac); Externý zdvih (závesné bremeno); Hasenie požiarov; Ochrana zákona; Armáda; Podpora na mori / ťažba ropy a plynu; Osobná doprava; Pátranie a záchrana (SAR); Turizmus/Výlety; Výcvik; Úžitkové; Iné
vi: Loại nhiệm vụ của máy bay trực thăng: Nông nghiệp (phun thuốc cây trồng); Doanh nghiệp/VIP; Dịch vụ y tế khẩn cấp (EMS/Medevac); Nâng ngoài (treo cẩu); Chữa cháy; Thực thi pháp luật; Quân sự; Hỗ trợ ngoài khơi/dầu khí; Vận chuyển hành khách; Tìm kiếm & cứu nạn (SAR); Du lịch/Tham quan; Đào tạo; Đa dụng; Khác
en: Helicopter mission type: Agricultural (crop spraying); Corporate/VIP; Emergency medical services (EMS/Medevac); External lift (sling load); Firefighting; Law enforcement; Military; Offshore/oil & gas support; Passenger transport; Search & rescue (SAR); Tourism/Sightseeing; Training; Utility; Other
ru: Тип назначения вертолета: Сельскохозяйственный (опрыскивание культур); Корпоративный/VIP; Скорая медицинская помощь (EMS/медэвакуация); Внешняя подвеска; Пожаротушение; Правоохранительные органы; Военный; Шельфовые работы/нефтегазовая отрасль; Пассажирские перевозки; Поисково-спасательный (ПСО); Туризм/осмотр достопримечательностей; Учебный; Многоцелевой; Другое
ro-RO: Tipul misiunii elicopter: Agricol (pulverizarea culturilor); Corporate/VIP; Servicii medicale de urgență (EMS/Medevac); Ridicare externă (sarcină suspendată); Stingerea incendiilor; Forțele de ordine; Militar; Offshore/suport pentru petrol și gaze; Transport de pasageri; Căutare și salvare (SAR); Turism/Zboruri de agrement; Instruire; Utilitar; Altele
fr: Type de mission de l’hélicoptère: Agricole (pulvérisation des cultures); Affaires/VIP; Services médicaux d’urgence (SMU/évacuation sanitaire); Levage externe (charge élinguée); Lutte contre les incendies; Forces de l’ordre; Militaire; Support offshore/pétrolier et gazier; Transport de passagers; Recherche et sauvetage (SAR); Tourisme/visites; Entraînement; Utilitaire; Autre
bg-BG: Тип мисия на хеликоптера: Селскостопанска (пръскане на култури); Корпоративна/VIP; Спешни медицински услуги (EMS/Medevac); Външен товар (на външно окачване); Противопожарна; Правоприлагаща; Военна; Офшорна/поддръжка на нефт и газ; Пътнически транспорт; Търсене и спасяване (SAR); Туризъм/разглеждане на забележителности; Обучение; Многоцелева; Други
zh-CN: 直升机任务类型: 农业（农作物喷洒）; 企业/VIP; 紧急医疗服务 (EMS/医疗疏散); 外部吊运（吊挂货物）; 消防; 执法; 军事; 近海/油气支持; 客运; 搜救 (SAR); 旅游/观光; 培训; 多用途; 其他
ja: ヘリコプターのミッションタイプ: 農業用 (農薬散布); 企業/VIP用; 救急医療サービス (EMS/医療後送); 外部吊り下げ (スリングロード); 消防; 法執行機関; 軍事; オフショア/石油・ガス支援; 旅客輸送; 捜索救助 (SAR); 観光/遊覧; 訓練; ユーティリティ; その他
nl: Helikopter missietype: Landbouw (gewasspuiten); Zakelijk/VIP; Medische hulpdiensten (EMS/Medevac); Externe lift (sling load); Brandbestrijding; Politie; Militair; Offshore/ondersteuning olie en gas; Passagiersvervoer; Zoek- en reddingsacties (SAR); Toerisme/sightseeing; Training; Utiliteit; Overig